Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4225.
peoplE of the state of michigan enact: TITLE An act to provide for certain requirements regarding suicide prevention for schools; to prescribe the rights, powers, duties, and privileges of schools, school districts, public school academies, intermediate school districts, and other public school entities, and nonpublic schools; to provide for and prescribe the powers and duties of certain state departments; and to provide for the regulation of certain school employees. Sec. 3. (1) Beginning 1 year after the effective date of this act, the The board of a school district or intermediate school district or the board of directors of a public school academy shall ensure that each school operated by the board or board of directors that offers any of grades 6 to 12 and that provides identification cards to pupils students enrolled at the school includes on each identification card provided to a pupil a student both of the following: (a) A local, state, or national suicide prevention hotline telephone number printed on it. The local, state, or national suicide prevention hotline telephone number included on pupil identification cards as described in this subsection subdivision must be a local, state, or national suicide prevention hotline telephone number that can be accessed for use 24 hours of each day and 7 days of each week by pupils students who attempt to utilize the hotline telephone number. (b) Beginning July 1, 2026, contact information for the OK2SAY program or a successor state program. (2) Beginning July 1, 2026, the governing body of a nonpublic school is encouraged to ensure that each school operated by the governing body that offers any of grades 6 to 12 and provides identification cards to students enrolled at that nonpublic school includes on each identification card provided to a student both of the following: (a) A local, state, or national suicide prevention hotline telephone number printed on it. The local, state, or national suicide prevention hotline telephone number as described in this subdivision must be a local, state, or national suicide prevention hotline telephone number that can be accessed for use 24 hours of each day and 7 days of each week by students who attempt to utilize the hotline telephone number. (b) Contact information for the OK2SAY program or a successor state program. (3) (2) For each school operated by the board of a school district or intermediate school district, or the board of directors of a public school academy, or the governing body of a nonpublic school that offers any of grades 6 to 12, the board, or board of directors, or governing body that operates that school is encouraged to display the model information materials developed or adopted under subsection (3) (4) on or in any of the following: (a) The school's website homepage. (b) A conspicuous location in the school counselor's office or the office of any school employee of the school qualified to act in a counseling role under section 1233 or 1233a of the revised school code, MCL 380.1233 and 380.1233a. (c) A conspicuous location in the office of the school principal or chief administrator of the school. (4) (3) The department of health and human services shall develop or adopt model information materials regarding suicide prevention services, suicide, depression, and anxiety for the purposes under subsection (2) (3) and shall, upon request by a school district, intermediate school district, or public school academy, or nonpublic school provide the model information materials to the requesting school district, intermediate school district, or public school academy, or nonpublic school. (5) (4) A school district, intermediate school district, public school academy, public school, nonpublic school, a board member of a board of a school district or intermediate school district or his or her the board member's designee, or a board of directors member of a board of directors of a public school academy or his or her the board of directors member's designee, or a member of the governing body of a nonpublic school or the member's designee is not liable in a criminal action or for civil damages arising from the failure to include a local, state, or national suicide prevention hotline telephone number or the contact information for the OK2SAY program or a successor state program on pupil student identification cards as required under subsection (1). This subsection does not eliminate, limit, or reduce any other immunity or defense that a person described under this subsection may have under other state law. Sec. 5. As used in this act: (a) "Intermediate school district" means that term as defined in section 4 of the revised school code, MCL 380.4. (b) "Nonpublic school" means that term as defined in section 5 of the revised school code, MCL 380.5. (c) "OK2SAY program" means this state's student safety program that allows students to confidentially report tips on potential harm or criminal activities directed at students, school employees, and schools. (d) (b) "Public school" and "public school academy" mean those terms as defined in section 5 of the revised school code, MCL 380.5. (e) (c) "School district" means that term as defined in section 6 of the revised school code, MCL 380.6. (f) (d) "The revised school code" means the revised school code, 1976 PA 451, MCL 380.1 to 380.1852.